Utah statutes.
31A-22-614.5.   Uniform claims processing -- Electronic exchange of health
information.
(1)  Beginning July 1, 1993, all insurers offering health insurance shall use
a uniform claim form and uniform billing and claim codes.
(2)  The uniform claim forms and billing codes shall be adopted and approved
by the commissioner in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah
Administrative Rulemaking Act.  The commissioner shall consult with the
director of the Division of Health Care Financing, the National Uniform Claim
Form Task Force, and the National Uniform Billing Committee when adopting the
uniform claims and billing codes.
(3) (a) (i)  Beginning July 1, 1995, all insurers shall offer compatible
systems of electronic billing approved by the commissioner in accordance with
Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act.
(ii)  The systems approved by the commissioner may include monitoring and
disseminating information concerning eligibility and coverage of individuals.
(iii)  The commissioner shall coordinate the administrative rules adopted
under the provisions of this section with the administrative rules adopted by
the Department of Health for the implementation of the standards for the
electronic exchange of clinical health information under Section 26-1-37.  The
department shall establish procedures for developing the rules adopted under
this section, which ensure that the Department of Health is given the
opportunity to comment on proposed rules.
(b)  The commissioner shall regulate any fees charged by insurers to the
providers for:
(i)  uniform claim forms;
(ii)  electronic billing; or
(iii)  the electronic exchange of clinical health information permitted by
Section 26-1-37.
